Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 5 Analysis of Milkfat Content in Milk or Milk Products

21-5-1 — 21-5-3.
Repealed.

21-5-4.
Annual inspection of testing machines.

Each Babcock or other centrifugal machine used by any person within the state of Rhode Island for determining the composition of milk, cream, or any milk product for purposes of inspection shall be inspected at least once in each calendar year by the director of labor and training.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 32; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 31; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-35; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 2.

21-5-5.
Condemnation or correction of defective machines.

Each Babcock or other centrifugal machine used as described in §

21-5-4

which, in the opinion of the director, is not in condition to give accurate results may be condemned by the director. No Babcock or other centrifugal machine which has been condemned shall be used for determining the composition or value of milk, cream, or any milk product, unless and until that machine is corrected to the satisfaction of the director and approved by him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 32; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 31; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-36; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-5

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-6.
Certification of testing machine operators — Fees.

It shall be unlawful for any person within the state of Rhode Island to manipulate the Babcock or other centrifugal machine to determine the composition of milk, cream, or any milk product for purposes of inspecting milk or milk products without first obtaining a certificate from the director that he or she is competent to do that work. The fee for certification shall be five dollars ($5.00), and shall be paid to the director for the use of the state. If a holder of a certificate is notified by the director to correct his or her use of the centrifugal machine, the actual cost of an inspection to ascertain if that person has corrected his or her use of the machine shall be paid by the person or by his or her employer to the director for the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 33; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 32; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-37; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-6

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 2.

21-5-7.
Issuance and revocation of machine operator certificates.

The director may issue certificates of competency to persons desiring to manipulate the Babcock or other centrifugal machine who, in his or her opinion, are competent. The director may make and enforce rules governing applications for the certificates and the granting of them, and may revoke the authority of any holder of a certificate who, in the director’s opinion, is not correctly manipulating a machine or is using dirty or unsatisfactory glassware or utensils in connection with the work. No holder of a certificate whose authority has been revoked shall after this manipulate any machine within the state of Rhode Island for the purposes mentioned in §

21-5-6

, until another certificate is granted to that person.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 34; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 33; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-38; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-7

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-8.
Repealed.

21-5-9.
Rules and regulations as to weighing and testing.

The director may make any rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, that in his or her judgment may be helpful in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and for the purpose of insuring accuracy in the weighing, sampling, and testing of milk, cream, and milk products within the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, ch. 203, § 36; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1915, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 35; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-40; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-9

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2; P.L. 1968, ch. 158, § 2.

21-5-10.
Penalty for obstruction or violations.

Whoever hinders or obstructs the director, or a duly authorized assistant, in the discharge of any authority or duty imposed by any provision of this chapter, and whoever violates any provision of this chapter or of any lawful regulations of the director made under the provisions of this chapter, shall be punished by a fine not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 37; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 36; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-41; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-10

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-11.
Testing for information only.

This chapter shall not affect any person using any centrifugal or other machine or test to determine the composition or value of milk, cream, or milk products if that use or test is made for that person’s information only, and not for purposes of inspection, or as a basis for payment in buying or selling.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 30; P.L. 1928, ch. 1138, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 37; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-42; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-11

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-12.
Inspectors and assistants.

The director shall employ and prescribe the duties of inspectors and assistants in enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 29; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 5; P.L. 1931, ch. 1703, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 29; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-43; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-12

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-13.
Enforcement.

When prosecuting any complaint under any provision of this chapter, the director and his or her deputies and assistants shall not be required to give surety for costs or enter into any recognizance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 29; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 5; P.L. 1931, ch. 1703, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 29; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-43; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-13

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.

21-5-14.
Appropriations and disbursements.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sums that it shall deem necessary for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sums or so much of them as may be required upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 203, § 29; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 5; P.L. 1931, ch. 1703, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 216, § 29; G.L. 1956, § 21-5-43; G.L. 1956, §

21-5-14

; P.L. 1962, ch. 80, § 2.